cs: Typ záznamu: Animace; ikony; Ilustrace; Licencované fotografie; Licencovaná videa; Textury; Vektory; Jiné
nl: Beeldmateriaaltype: Animaties; Pictogrammen; Illustraties; Stockfoto's; Stockvideo's; Texturen; Vectors; Andere
ko: 영상 유형: 애니메이션; 아이콘; 일러스트레이션; 스톡 이미지; 스톡 비디오; 텍스처; 벡터; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta posnetka: Animacije; Ikone; Ilustracije; Založne fotografije; Založni videoposnetki; Teksture; Vektorji; Drugo
sv: Typ av bild- och filmmaterial: Animationer; Ikoner; Illustrationer; Stockbild; Stockvideor; Texturer; Vektorer; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de gravação: Animações; Ícones; Ilustrações; Fotografias de banco de imagens; Vídeos de banco de imagens; Texturas; Vetores; Outro
en: Footage type: Animations; Icons; Illustrations; Stock photos; Stock videos; Textures; Vectors; Other
lt-LT: Įrašo tipas: Animacijos; Piktogramos; Iliustracijos; Standartinės nuotraukos; Standartiniai vaizdo įrašai; Tekstūros; Vektoriai; Kita
vi: Loại cảnh quay thô: Hoạt hình; Biểu tượng; Minh họa; Ảnh chụp sẵn; Video quay sẵn; Họa tiết; Vector; Khác
el: Τύπος υλικού βίντεο: Κινούμενα σχέδια; Eικονίδια; Εικονογραφήσεις; Φωτογραφίες αρχείου; Βίντεο αρχείου; Υφές; Διανύσματα; Άλλο
it: Tipo di filmato: Animazioni; Icone; Illustrazioni; Foto gratuite; Video gratuiti; Trame; Vettori; Altro
bg-BG: Вид заснет материал: Анимации; Икони; Илюстрации; Стокови снимки; Стокови видеоклипове; Текстури; Вектори; Други
zh-CN: 录像素材类型: 动画; 图标; 插图; 库存照片; 库存视频; 纹理; 向量; 其他
ru: Тип стокового материала: Анимации; Иконки; Иллюстрации; Стоковые фото; Стоковые видео; Текстуры; Векторы; Другой
ro-RO: Tip fotografie/filmare: Animații; Pictograme; Ilustrații; Fotografii de stoc; Videoclipuri de stoc; Texturi; Vectori; Altele
sk-SK: Typ záznamu: Animácie; Ikony; Ilustrácie; Fotografie z databázy; Videá  z databázy; Štruktúry; Vektory; Iné
nb: Opptakstype: Animasjoner; Ikoner; Illustrasjoner; Arkivbilder; Arkivvideoer; Teksturer; Vektorer; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de filmagem: Animações; Ícones; Ilustrações; Fotos de banco de imagem; Vídeos do banco de vídeos; Texturas; Vetores; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta snimke: Animacije; Ikone; Ilustracije; Stock fotografije; Stock videozapisi; Teksture; Vektori; Ostalo
es: Tipo de stock: Animaciones; Iconos; Ilustraciones; Fotos de archivo; Videos de archivo; Texturas; Vectores; Otros
da: Optagelsestype: Animationer; Ikoner; Illustrationer; Stock-fotos; Stock-videoer; Teksturer; Vektorer; Andet
tr: Çekim Türü: Animasyonlar; Simgeler; İllüstrasyonlar; Stok fotoğraflar; Stok videolar; Dokular; Vektörler; Diğer
ja: 映像の種類: アニメーション; アイコン; イラスト; ストックフォト; ストックビデオ; テクスチャ; ベクター; その他
de: Aufnahmetyp: Animationen; Symbole; Illustrationen; Stock-Fotos; Stock-Videos; Texturen; Vektoren; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทฟุตเทจ: ภาพเคลื่อนไหว; ไอคอน; ภาพประกอบ; ภาพสต็อก; วิดีโอสต็อก; พื้นผิว; เวกเตอร์; อื่นๆ
fi: Kuvamateriaalityyppi: Animaatiot; Kuvakkeet; Kuvitukset; Kuvapankkikuvat; Kuvapankkivideot; Tekstuurit; Vektorit; Muu
zh-TW: 素材類型: 3D 動畫; 圖示; 插畫; 圖庫相片; 圖庫影片; 紋理; 向量; 其他
pl: Typ materiału filmowego: Animacje; Ikony; Spis rysunków; Zdjęcia stockowe; Filmy stockowe; Tekstury; Wektory; Inne
hu: Felvétel típusa: Animációk; Ikonok; Illusztrációk; Stockfotók; Stockvideók; Textúrák; Vektorok; Egyéb
fr: Type d’enregistrement: Animations; Icônes; Illustrations; Photos d’illustration; Vidéos d’illustration; Textures; Vecteurs; Autre